District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-218.23

Additional functions of the Commission.

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2323, 52 DCR 7503
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-207, § 2(d), 55 DCR 6107
Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(e), 57 DCR 1485
D.C. Law 17-207 substituted “certified” for “local, small, and disadvantaged”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-96, January 29, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 3403).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2323 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-156, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10919).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-251, January 23, 2008, 55 DCR 1259).